Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 1 General Provisions

46-8-1 through 46-8-4.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 13; Civil Code 1895, § 2175; 1899, p. 54, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§
2593, 2598, 2599; Code 1933, §§ 94-314, 94-319, 94-320; Ga. L. 1953, Ex. Sess., p. 213, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 113; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 1/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 1/SB 285 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2006.